District of Columbia statutes.
22-2801

Robbery.

Whoever by force or violence, whether against resistance or by sudden or stealthy seizure or snatching, or by putting in fear, shall take from the person or immediate actual possession of another anything of value, is guilty of robbery, and any person convicted thereof shall suffer imprisonment for not less than 2 years nor more than 15 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1322, ch. 854, § 810
Dec. 27, 1967, 81 Stat. 737, Pub. L. 90-226, title VI, § 603
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(h), 60 DCR 2064
Armed offenses, additional penalty for committing crime when armed, see §§ 22-4501 and 22-4502.
Burglary, see § 22-801 et seq.
Grave robbery, see § 22-3303.
Larceny and receiving stolen goods, see § 22-3201 et seq.
Murder after person has been convicted of crime of violence, minimum sentence, see § 24-403.
Receiving stolen property, see § 22-3232.
Senior citizen victims, enhanced penalty for crimes committed against, see § 22-3601.
Theft, see § 22-3211.
This section is referenced in § 11-502, § 22-2802, § 23-546, and § 24-112.
1981 Ed., § 22-2901.
1973 Ed., § 22-2901.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(h) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.